Vermont, session 2025-2026, S73.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 501 is amended to read:
§ 501. RECOVERY OF LANDS
(a) Except as otherwise provided in 32 V.S.A. § 5263, an action for the
recovery of lands, or the possession thereof, shall not be maintained, unless
commenced within 15 years after the cause of action first accrues to the
plaintiff or those under whom he or she the plaintiff claims.
VT LEG #379114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.73
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) An action for adverse possession shall not be maintained unless the
plaintiff has provided the record owner of the property with notice of the
plaintiff’s claim to the property not less than six months prior to the expiration
of the 15-year period established by subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379114 v.1